Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4572.
People of the State of Michigan enact: part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 152,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 152,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 152,000,000 For Fiscal Year Ending Sept. 30, 2026 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 152,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 152,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 152,000,000 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Selfridge Air National Guard Base $ 152,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 152,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 152,000,000 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $152,000,000.00 and total state spending from state sources under part 1 to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under this part or part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, inter-transfer funds for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS Sec. 301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for Selfridge Air National Guard Base must be used to support costs of runway encroachment solutions while complying with air installation compatible use zone program recommendations, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) Capital improvements necessary to shift the runway to the north and repair the airfield and nonairfield features of the base and surrounding community impacted by the shift. (b) Infrastructure projects including, but not limited to, roadways repairs, vehicle access to the base and to the museum, stormwater drain and culvert repairs and modernization, force protection features, airfield features, and taxiway extensions. (2) Unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for Selfridge Air National Guard Base are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to support costs of runway encroachment solutions. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $152,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2027. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor